Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2099.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-IDELAYED PAYMENT PLAN PROGRAMSection 1901-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance 1234567891011121314151617181920 Agency."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Delayed Payment Plan Program Fund established under section 1905-I."Income." Salary, wages, interest, dividends and other earnings that are reportable for Federal income tax purposes."Income share agreement." An agreement between the agency and a student under which the student commits to pay a specified percentage of the student's future income, for a specified period of time, in addition to the requirements and terms specified under sections 1903-I and 1906-I, in exchange for payments to, or on behalf of, the student for a portion of the student's tuition for attendance at the institution of higher education."Institution of higher education." As defined under section 118(c)."Participating institution." A participating institution of higher education."Program." The Delayed Payment Plan Program established under section 1902-I."Tuition." A sum of money charged for teaching or instruction by a participating institution.Section 1902-I. Establishment of program.Subject to receipt of grants, contributions or amounts appropriated specifically for this purpose, the Delayed Payment Plan Program is established. The agency may enter into an income share agreement with a student accepted for enrollment at any of the 15 Pennsylvania State community colleges or the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology beginning with the 2025-2026 20250HB2099PN2699 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 academic year. The agency may decide to offer the program to students accepted or enrolled in any State System of Higher Education institution beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.Section 1903-I. Eligibility requirements.In order to qualify for participation in the program, a student must meet all of the following requirements:(1) The student must be a resident of this Commonwealth, as defined by the Pennsylvania State Grant Program.(2) The student must agree to remain a resident of this Commonwealth for 10 years after graduation or until the tuition is repaid, whichever occurs first.(3) The student shall pursue a degree in a high-need area, as identified by the participating institution and approved by the agency.(4) The student must demonstrate Federal Direct Student Loan eligibility.Section 1904-I. Powers and duties of agency.The agency shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Impose reasonable limits on the terms of income share agreements.(2) Partner with participating institutions to publicize the availability of the program to students and to select participants for the program, subject to the number of students that may be supported by the fund.(3) Distribute income share agreement program money to participating institutions based on the total annual tuition cost for participating students.(4) Contract with a program administrator for execution of income share agreements.(5) Ensure transparency in investment decisions and 20250HB2099PN2699 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 processes.(6) Make, execute and deliver contracts, conveyances and other instruments necessary to exercise and discharge the agency's powers and duties under this article.Section 1905-I. Delayed Payment Plan Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Delayed Payment Plan Program Fund is established within the State Treasury from which income share agreement money shall be disbursed to program administrators through the agency. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for the program. Administrative costs for the program may not exceed $400,000 in the first year of the program or $300,000 annually thereafter. Only the agency may authorize expenditures from the fund.(b) Sources of fund.--The fund shall consist of:(1) Grants and contributions from private sources.(2) Appropriations made to the fund by the General Assembly.(3) Money collected under income share agreements.(4) Interest on money deposited into the fund.Section 1906-I. Income share agreement terms.An income share agreement entered into under this article must:(1) Specify the period of repayment, which shall not exceed 10 years and shall commence six months after the later of graduation of the student from:(i) A participating institution upon successful completion of a degree, diploma or certificate program.(ii) A four-year institution of higher education, if the student is admitted to the four-year institution of higher education within six months of completing required 20250HB2099PN2699 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 coursework, or at the discretion of the agency.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (5), provide that no monthly payment be owed by the student for any period of time during which the student's annual income is equal to or less than $30,000.(3) Specify the terms and conditions under which the student may extinguish the student's repayment obligation under the agreement before the end of the repayment period.(4) Specify that the student is required to repay a minimum of 2% of future annual income or no less than $50 per month for 10 years or until the tuition is repaid, whichever occurs first.(5) Provide that a student with an outstanding balance at the end of the 10-year period under paragraph (4) be required to repay the remaining balance plus 3.5% annualized interest on the remaining balance until repaid.(6) Specify a cap on the total amount that a student is required to repay under the agreement, which may not exceed 200% of the amount provided to the student under the income share agreement.(7) Specify that a student's obligation under an income share agreement may be forgiven if the student meets either of the following:(i) Is unable to engage in substantial gainful activity by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment that:(A) can be expected to result in death;(B) has lasted for a continuous period of not less than 60 months; or(C) can be expected to last for a continuous 20250HB2099PN2699 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 period of not less than 60 months.(ii) Has been determined by the United States Secretary of Veterans Affairs to be unemployable due to a service-connected disability.(8) Specify that a student's obligation under an income share agreement shall be discharged if the student dies.(9) Specify that an income share agreement is not a debt instrument.(10) Provide that a participating student who does not complete coursework after six years be required to repay the student's outstanding balance with a $50 per month minimum payment plus 3.5% annualized interest, unless the student meets any of the criteria specified in paragraph (7).Section 1907-I. Notification to student.An income share agreement is not in compliance with this article unless the student, prior to entering into the income share agreement, is provided with written notification that clearly states all of the following:(1) That the income share agreement is not a debt instrument.(2) That the amount the student will be required to pay under the income share agreement may be more or less than the amount provided to the student, but shall not be more than the cap determined under section 1906-I(6).(3) The terms and conditions under which the student may extinguish the student's repayment obligation under the income share agreement before the end of the repayment period.(4) The duration of the student's obligation under the income share agreement.20250HB2099PN2699 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The percentage of the student's future annual income that the student is committing to pay under the income share agreement, as determined under section 1906-I(4) and the minimum amount of annual income that triggers the student's repayment obligation under the income share agreement.(6) The definition of "income" used to calculate the student's repayment obligation.Section 1908-I. Reports.(a) Initial report.--The agency, in consultation with participating institutions, shall submit a report to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the Education Committee of the Senate and the Education Committee of the House of Representatives no later than March 1, 2027. The report shall include, but not be limited to:(1) The number of students, by credit level, who have entered into an income share agreement with a participating institution.(2) The average amount of money provided to students under income share agreements.(3) A complete count, by course of study, of all students who have entered into an income share agreement with a participating institution.(b) Further report.--The agency, in consultation with participating institutions and the department, shall submit a report to the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the Education Committee of the Senate and the Education Committee of the House of Representatives no later than March 1, 2030. The report shall include, but not be limited to:20250HB2099PN2699 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The number of students, by credit level, who have entered into an income share agreement with the participating institutions.(2) The number of graduates who entered into an income share agreement with participating institutions, the average and range of annual incomes of those graduates and the average and range of the monthly payments under income share agreements.(3) The balance of the fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2099PN2699 - 8 - 12345678910